Missouri, session 2026, HB2957.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 334.870 and 334.880, RSMo, are repealed and fifteen new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 334.870, 334.880, 334.1950,
334.1953, 334.1956, 334.1959, 334.1962, 334.1965, 334.1968, 334.1971, 334.1974,
334.1977, 334.1980, 334.1983, and 334.1986, to read as follows:
334.870. An applicant for a license to practice respiratory care may be issued a
license which is valid until the expiration date as determined by the board after the following
requirements have been met:
(1) The applicant submits to the board:
(a) A completed application for licensure;
(b) Written evidence of:
a. [Credentials from the certifying entity; or] An active credential as a registered
respiratory therapist through the National Board for Respiratory Care or a successor
credentialing organization;
b. Current licensure or registration [as a respiratory care practitioner] with an active
credential as a registered respiratory therapist that authorizes the practice of
respiratory care in another state, the District of Columbia or territory of the United States
which requires standards for licensure or registration determined by the board to be
equivalent to, or exceed, the requirements for licensure under sections 334.800 to 334.930; or
c. An active credential as a certified respiratory therapist earned before January
1, 2027, through the National Board for Respiratory Care; and
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2957 2
(c) Payment of any required fees;
(2) The board requests and receives a complete background check and other
information as may be deemed necessary to fulfill sections 334.800 to 334.910;
(3) An applicant who has completed the requirements of subdivision (1) of this
section and has submitted the necessary information for the background check pursuant to
subdivision (2) of this section may obtain a conditional license to practice as a respiratory
care practitioner pending the outcome of the background check subject to the following
restrictions:
(a) The conditional license shall only be issued if the applicant has made a prima facie
showing that he or she meets all of the requirements for full licensure;
(b) The conditional license shall only be effective until the board has had an
opportunity to investigate the applicant's qualifications for licensure pursuant to subdivisions
(1) and (2) of this section and to notify the applicant that his or her application for licensure
has been granted or denied;
(c) If the applicant provides false or misleading information to the board, the board
may automatically terminate the conditional license. If the board automatically terminates a
conditional license, the board shall notify the holder of the board's decision by certified mail
or personal service;
(d) In no event shall such conditional license be in effect for more than twelve months
after the date of its issuance;
(e) A conditional license shall not be eligible for renewal; and
(f) No fee shall be charged for issuing a conditional license.
334.880. 1. A license issued pursuant to sections 334.800 to 334.930 shall be
renewed biennially, except as provided in sections 334.800 to 334.930. The board shall mail
a notice to each person licensed during the preceding licensing period at least thirty calendar
days prior to the expiration date of the license. The board shall not renew any license unless
the licensee shall provide satisfactory evidence of having complied with the board's minimum
requirements for continuing education.
2. Failure of a licensee to renew his or her license prior to the expiration of the license
shall result in the lapse of the license. A lapsed license may be reinstated by the board as
provided by rule.
3. Any license renewal shall be subject to a random audit to ensure the licensee
has an active credential through the National Board for Respiratory Care or a successor
credentialing organization. If a license renewal is audited, proof of an active credential
shall be submitted directly to the board by the National Board for Respiratory Care or
the successor credentialing organization.

HCS HB 2957 3
4. Each licensee may, in lieu of submitting proof of the completion of the required
continuing education course, apply for an inactive license at the time of renewal and pay the
required inactive fee. An inactive license shall be renewed biennially. An inactive license
may be reactivated by the board as provided by rule.
[4.] 5. Any person who practices as a respiratory care practitioner during the time his
or her license is inactive or lapsed shall be considered an illegal practitioner and shall be
subject to the penalties for violation of the respiratory care practice act.
334.1950. 1. Sections 334.1950 to 334.1986 shall be known and may be cited as
the "Respiratory Care Interstate Compact".
2. The purpose of this Compact is to facilitate the interstate Practice of
Respiratory Therapy with the goal of improving public access to Respiratory Therapy
services by providing Respiratory Therapists licensed in a Member State the ability to
practice in other Member States. The Compact preserves the regulatory authority of
states to protect public health and safety through the current system of State licensure.
3. This Compact is designed to achieve the following objectives:
(1) Increase public access to Respiratory Therapy services by creating a
responsible, streamlined pathway for Licensees to practice in Member States with the
goal of improving outcomes for patients;
(2) Enhance States' ability to protect the public's health and safety;
(3) Promote the cooperation of Member States in regulating the Practice of
Respiratory Therapy within those Member States;
(4) Ease administrative burdens on States by encouraging the cooperation of
Member States in regulating multi-state Respiratory Therapy practice;
(5) Support relocating Active Military Members and their spouses; and
(6) Promote mobility and address workforce shortages.
334.1953. As used in this Compact, unless the context requires otherwise, the
following definitions shall apply:
(1) "Active Military Member" means any person with a full-time duty status in
the armed forces of the United States, including members of the National Guard and
Reserve.
(2) "Adverse Action" means any administrative, civil, equitable, or criminal
action permitted by a State's laws which is imposed by any State authority with
regulatory authority over Respiratory Therapists, such as license denial, censure,
revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of the Licensee, or restriction on the
Licensee's practice, not including participation in an Alternative Program.
(3) "Alternative Program" means a non-disciplinary monitoring or practice
remediation process applicable to a Respiratory Therapist approved by any State

HCS HB 2957 4
authority with regulatory authority over Respiratory Therapists. This includes, but is
not limited to, programs to which Licensees with substance abuse or addiction issues are
referred in lieu of Adverse Action.
(4) "Charter Member States" means those Member States who were the first
seven states to enact the Compact into the laws of their State.
(5) "Commission" or "Respiratory Care Interstate Compact Commission"
means the government instrumentality and body politic whose membership consists of
all Member States that have enacted the Compact.
(6) "Commissioner" means the individual appointed by a Member State to serve
as the member of the Commission for that Member State.
(7) "Compact" means the Respiratory Care Interstate Compact.
(8) "Compact Privilege" means the authorization granted by a Remote State to
allow a Licensee from another Member State to practice as a Respiratory Therapist in
the Remote State under the Remote State's laws and Rules. The Practice of Respiratory
Therapy occurs in the Member State where the patient is located at the time of the
patient encounter.
(9) "Criminal Background Check" means the submission by the Member State
of fingerprints or other biometric-based information on license applicants at the time of
initial licensing for the purpose of obtaining that applicant's criminal history record
information, as defined in 28 C.F.R. § 20.3(d) or successor provision, from the Federal
Bureau of Investigation and the State's criminal history record repository, as defined in
28 C.F.R. § 20.3(f) or successor provision.
(10) "Data System" means the Commission's repository of information about
Licensees as further set forth in section 334.1971.
(11) "Domicile" means the jurisdiction which is the Licensee's principal home
for legal purposes.
(12) "Encumbered License" means a license that a State's Respiratory Therapy
Licensing Authority has limited in any way.
(13) "Executive Committee" means a group of directors elected or appointed to
act on behalf of, and within the powers granted to them by the Commission.
(14) "Home State" except as set forth in section 334.1962, means the Member
State that is the Licensee's primary Domicile.
(15) "Home State License" means an active license to practice Respiratory
Therapy in a Home State that is not an Encumbered License.
(16) "Jurisprudence Requirement" means an assessment of an individual's
knowledge of the State laws and regulations governing the Practice of Respiratory
Therapy in such State.

HCS HB 2957 5
(17) "Licensee" means an individual who currently holds an authorization from
the State to practice as a Respiratory Therapist.
(18) "Member State" means a State that has enacted the Compact and been
admitted to the Commission in accordance with the provisions herein and Commission
Rules.
(19) "Model Compact" means the model for the Respiratory Care Interstate
Compact on file with The Council of State Governments or other entity as designated by
the Commission.
(20) "Remote State" means a Member State where a Licensee is exercising or
seeking to exercise the Compact Privilege.
(21) "Respiratory Therapist" or "Respiratory Care Practitioner" means an
individual who holds a credential issued by the National Board for Respiratory Care (or
its successor) and holds a license in a State to practice Respiratory Therapy. For
purposes of this Compact, any other title or status adopted by a State to replace the
term "Respiratory Therapist" or "Respiratory Care Practitioner" shall be deemed
synonymous with "Respiratory Therapist" and shall confer the same rights and
responsibilities to the Licensee under the provisions of this Compact at the time of its
enactment.
(22) "Respiratory Therapy," "Respiratory Therapy Practice," "Respiratory
Care," "the Practice of Respiratory Care," and "the Practice of Respiratory Therapy"
means the care and services provided by or under the direction and supervision of a
Respiratory Therapist or Respiratory Care Practitioner.
(23) "Respiratory Therapy Licensing Authority" means the agency, board, or
other body of a State that is responsible for licensing and regulation of Respiratory
Therapists.
(24) "Rule" means a regulation promulgated by an entity that has the force and
effect of law.
(25) "Scope of Practice" means the procedures, actions, and processes a
Respiratory Therapist licensed in a State or practicing under a Compact Privilege in a
State is permitted to undertake in that State and the circumstances under which the
Respiratory Therapist is permitted to undertake those procedures, actions, and
processes. Such procedures, actions, and processes, and the circumstances under
which they may be undertaken may be established through means, including, but not
limited to, statute, regulations, case law, and other processes available to the State
Respiratory Therapy Licensing Authority or other government agency.
(26) "Significant Investigative Information" means information, records, and
documents received or generated by a State Respiratory Therapy Licensing Authority

HCS HB 2957 6
pursuant to an investigation for which a determination has been made that there is
probable cause to believe that the Licensee has violated a statute or regulation that is
considered more than a minor infraction for which the State Respiratory Therapy
Licensing Authority could pursue Adverse Action against the Licensee.
(27) "State" means any state, commonwealth, district, or territory of the United
States.
334.1956. 1. In order to participate in this Compact and thereafter continue as a
Member State, a Member State shall:
(1) Enact a Compact that is not materially different from the Model Compact;
(2) License Respiratory Therapists;
(3) Participate in the Commission's Data System;
(4) Have a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating complaints
against Licensees and Compact Privilege holders;
(5) Notify the Commission, in compliance with the terms of this Compact and
Commission Rules, of any Adverse Action against a Licensee, a Compact Privilege
holder, or a license applicant;
(6) Notify the Commission, in compliance with the terms of this Compact and
Commission Rules, of the existence of Significant Investigative Information;
(7) Comply with the Rules of the Commission;
(8) Grant the Compact Privilege to a holder of an active Home State License and
otherwise meet the applicable requirements of section 334.1959 in a Member State; and
(9) Complete a Criminal Background Check for each new Licensee at the time of
initial licensure. Where expressly authorized or permitted by federal law, whether such
federal law is in effect prior to, at, or after the time of a Member State's enactment of
this Compact, a Member State's enactment of this Compact shall hereby authorize the
Member State's Respiratory Therapy Licensing Authority to perform Criminal
Background Checks as defined herein. The absence of such a federal law as
described in this subdivision shall not prevent or preclude such authorization where it
may be derived or granted through means other than the enactment of this Compact.
2. Nothing in this Compact prohibits a Member State from charging a fee for
granting and renewing the Compact Privilege.
334.1959. 1. To exercise the Compact Privilege under the terms and provisions
of the Compact, the Licensee shall:
(1) Hold and maintain an active Home State License as a Respiratory Therapist;
(2) Hold and maintain an active credential from the National Board for
Respiratory Care (or its successor) that would qualify them for licensure in the Remote
State in which they are seeking the privilege;

HCS HB 2957 7
(3) Have not had any Adverse Action against a license within the previous two
(2) years;
(4) Notify the Commission that the Licensee is seeking the Compact Privilege
within a Remote State or States;
(5) Pay any applicable fees, including any State and Commission fees and
renewal fees, for the Compact Privilege;
(6) Meet any Jurisprudence Requirements established by the Remote State in
which the Licensee is seeking a Compact Privilege;
(7) Report to the Commission Adverse Action taken by any non-Member State
within thirty (30) days from the date the Adverse Action is taken;
(8) Report to the Commission, when applying for a Compact Privilege, the
address of the Licensee's Domicile and thereafter promptly report to the Commission
any change in the address of the Licensee's Domicile within thirty (30) days of the
effective date of the change in address; and
(9) Consent to accept service of process by mail at the Licensee's Domicile on
record with the Commission with respect to any action brought against the Licensee by
the Commission or a Member State, and consent to accept service of a subpoena by mail
at the Licensee's Domicile on record with the Commission with respect to any action
brought or investigation conducted by the Commission or a Member State.
2. The Compact Privilege is valid until the expiration date or revocation of the
Home State License unless terminated pursuant to Adverse Action. The Licensee must
comply with all of the requirements of subsection 1 of this section to maintain the
Compact Privilege in a Remote State. If those requirements are met, no Adverse
Actions are taken, and the Licensee has paid any applicable Compact Privilege renewal
fees, then the Licensee will maintain the Licensee's Compact Privilege.
3. A Licensee providing Respiratory Therapy in a Remote State under the
Compact Privilege shall function within the Scope of Practice authorized by the Remote
State for the type of Respiratory Therapist license the Licensee holds. Such procedures,
actions, processes, and the circumstances under which they may be undertaken may be
established through means, including, but not limited to, statute, regulations, case law,
and other processes available to the State Respiratory Therapy Licensing Authority or
other government agency.
4. If a Licensee's Compact Privilege in a Remote State is removed by the Remote
State, the individual shall lose or be ineligible for the Compact privilege in that Remote
State until the Compact Privilege is no longer limited or restricted by that State.
5. If a Home State License is encumbered, the Licensee shall lose the Compact
Privilege in all Remote States until the following occur:

HCS HB 2957 8
(1) The Home State License is no longer encumbered; and
(2) Two (2) years have elapsed from the date on which the license is no longer
encumbered due to the Adverse Action.
6. Once a Licensee with a restricted or limited license meets the requirements of
subdivisions (1) and (2) of subsection 5 of this section, the Licensee must also meet the
requirements of subsection 1 of this section to obtain a Compact Privilege in a Remote
State.
334.1962. 1. An Active Military Member, or their spouse, shall designate a
Home State where the individual has a current license in good standing. The individual
may retain the Home State designation during the period the service member is on
active duty.
2. An Active Military Member and their spouse shall not be required to pay to
the Commission for a Compact Privilege any fee that may otherwise be charged by the
Commission. If a Remote State chooses to charge a fee for a Compact Privilege, it may
choose to charge a reduced fee or no fee to an Active Military Member and their spouse
for a Compact Privilege.
334.1965. 1. A Member State in which a Licensee is licensed shall have authority
to impose Adverse Action against the license issued by that Member State.
2. A Member State may take Adverse Action based on Significant Investigative
Information of a Remote State or the Home State, so long as the Member State follows
its own procedures for imposing Adverse Action.
3. Nothing in this Compact shall override a Member State's decision that
participation in an Alternative Program may be used in lieu of Adverse Action and that
such participation shall remain non-public if required by the Member State's laws.
4. A Remote State shall have the authority to:
(1) Take Adverse Actions as set forth herein against a Licensee's Compact
Privilege in that State;
(2) Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that require the
attendance and testimony of witnesses, and the production of evidence.
(a) Subpoenas may be issued by a Respiratory Therapy Licensing Authority in a
Member State for the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of
evidence.
(b) Subpoenas issued by a Respiratory Therapy Licensing Authority in a
Member State for the attendance and testimony of witnesses shall be enforced in the
latter State by any court of competent jurisdiction in the latter State, according to the
practice and procedure of that court applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings
pending before it.

HCS HB 2957 9
(c) Subpoenas issued by a Respiratory Therapy Licensing Authority in a
Member State for production of evidence from another Member State shall be enforced
in the latter State, according to the practice and procedure of that court applicable to
subpoenas issued in the proceedings pending before it.
(d) The issuing authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage,
and other fees required by the service statutes of the State where the witnesses or
evidence are located;
(3) Unless otherwise prohibited by State law, recover from the Licensee the costs
of investigations and disposition of cases resulting from any Adverse Action taken
against that Licensee;
(4) Notwithstanding subdivision (2) of this subsection, a Member State may not
issue a subpoena to gather evidence of conduct in another Member State that is lawful in
such other Member State for the purpose of taking Adverse Action against a Licensee's
Compact Privilege or application for a Compact Privilege in that Member State; and
(5) Nothing in this Compact authorizes a Member State to impose discipline
against a Respiratory Therapist's Compact Privilege in that Member State for the
individual's otherwise lawful practice in another State.
5. (1) In addition to the authority granted to a Member State by its respective
Respiratory Therapy Practice act or other applicable state law, a Member State may
participate with other Member States in joint investigations of Licensees, provided,
however, that a Member State receiving such a request has no obligation to respond to
any subpoena issued regarding an investigation of conduct or practice that was lawful in
a Member State at the time it was undertaken.
(2) Member States shall share any Significant Investigative Information,
litigation, or compliance materials in furtherance of any joint or individual investigation
initiated under the Compact. In sharing such information between Member State
Respiratory Therapy Licensing Authorities, all information obtained shall be kept
confidential, except as otherwise mutually agreed upon by the sharing and receiving
Member States.
6. Nothing in this Compact may permit a Member State to take any Adverse
Action against a Licensee or holder of a Compact Privilege for conduct or practice that
was legal in the Member State at the time it was undertaken.
7. Nothing in this Compact may permit a Member State to take disciplinary
action against a Licensee or holder of a Compact Privilege for conduct or practice that
was legal in the Member State at the time it was undertaken.
334.1968. 1. The Compact Member States hereby create and establish a joint
government agency whose membership consists of all Member States that have enacted

HCS HB 2957 10
the Compact known as the Respiratory Care Interstate Compact Commission. The
Commission is an instrumentality of the Compact Member States acting jointly and not
an instrumentality of any one State. The Commission shall come into existence on or
after the effective date of the Compact, as set forth in section 334.1980.
2. (1) Each Member State shall have and be limited to one (1) Commissioner
selected by that Member State's Respiratory Therapy Licensing Authority.
(2) The Commissioner shall be an administrator or their designated staff
member of the Member State's Respiratory Therapy Licensing Authority.
(3) The Commission shall by Rule or bylaw establish a term of office for
Commissioners and may by Rule or bylaw establish term limits.
(4) The Commission may recommend to a Member State the removal or
suspension of any Commissioner from office.
(5) A Member State's Respiratory Therapy Licensing Authority shall fill any
vacancy of its Commissioner occurring on the Commission within sixty (60) days of the
vacancy.
(6) Each Commissioner shall be entitled to one vote on all matters before the
Commission requiring a vote by Commissioners.
(7) A Commissioner shall vote in person or by such other means as provided in
the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for Commissioners to meet by telecommunication,
videoconference, or other means of communication.
(8) The Commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year.
Additional meetings may be held as set forth in the bylaws.
3. The Commission shall have the following powers:
(1) Establish and amend the fiscal year of the Commission;
(2) Establish and amend bylaws and policies, including but not limited to, a code
of conduct and conflict of interest;
(3) Establish and amend Rules, which shall be binding in all Member States;
(4) Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;
(5) Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of this
Compact, the Commission's Rules, and the bylaws;
(6) Initiate and conduct legal proceedings or actions in the name of the
Commission, provided that the standing of any Respiratory Therapy Licensing
Authority to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be affected;
(7) Maintain and certify records and information provided to a Member State as
the authenticated business records of the Commission, and designate an agent to do so
on the Commission's behalf;
(8) Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;

HCS HB 2957 11
(9) Accept or contract for services of personnel, including, but not limited to,
employees of a Member State;
(10) Conduct an annual financial review;
(11) Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties,
grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the Compact,
and establish the Commission's personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of
interest, qualifications of personnel, and other related personnel matters;
(12) Assess and collect fees;
(13) Accept any and all appropriate gifts, donations, grants of money, other
sources of revenue, equipment, supplies, materials, and services, and receive, utilize, and
dispose of the same, provided that at all times:
(a) The Commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety; and
(b) The Commission shall avoid any appearance of conflict of interest;
(14) Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or use any property, real,
personal, or mixed, or any undivided interest therein;
(15) Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise
dispose of any property real, personal, or mixed;
(16) Establish a budget and make expenditures;
(17) Borrow money in a fiscally responsible manner;
(18) Appoint committees, including standing committees, composed of
Commissioners, State regulators, State legislators or their representatives, and
consumer representatives, and such other interested persons as may be designated in
this Compact and the bylaws;
(19) Provide and receive information from, and cooperate with, law enforcement
agencies;
(20) Establish and elect an Executive Committee, including a chair, vice-chair,
secretary, treasurer, and such other offices as the Commission shall establish by Rule or
bylaw;
(21) Enter into contracts or arrangements for the management of the affairs of
the Commission;
(22) Determine whether a State's adopted language is materially different from
the Model Compact language such that the State would not qualify for participation in
the Compact; and
(23) Perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve
the purposes of this Compact.

HCS HB 2957 12
4. (1) The Executive Committee shall have the power to act on behalf of the
Commission according to the terms of this Compact. The powers, duties, and
responsibilities of the Executive Committee shall include:
(a) Overseeing the day-to-day activities of the administration of the Compact,
including enforcement and compliance with the provisions of the Compact, its Rules and
bylaws, and other such duties as deemed necessary;
(b) Recommending to the Commission changes to the Rules or bylaws, changes
to this Compact legislation, fees charged to Compact Member States, fees charged to
Licensees, and other fees;
(c) Ensuring Compact administration services are appropriately provided,
including by contract;
(d) Preparing and recommending the budget;
(e) Maintaining financial records on behalf of the Commission;
(f) Monitoring Compact compliance of Member States and providing
compliance reports to the Commission;
(g) Establishing additional committees as necessary;
(h) Exercising the powers and duties of the Commission during the interim
between Commission meetings, except for adopting or amending Rules, adopting or
amending bylaws, and exercising any other powers and duties expressly reserved to the
Commission by Rule or bylaw; and
(i) Performing other duties as provided in the Rules or bylaws of the
Commission.
(2) The Executive Committee shall be composed of up to nine (9) members, as
further set forth in the bylaws of the Commission:
(a) Seven (7) voting members who are elected by the Commission from the
100 current membership of the Commission; and
101 (b) Two (2) ex-officio, non-voting members.
102 (3) The Commission may remove any member of the Executive Committee as
103 provided in the Commission's bylaws.
104 (4) The Executive Committee shall meet at least annually.
105 (a) Executive Committee meetings shall be open to the public, except that the
106 Executive Committee may meet in a closed, non-public meeting as provided in
107 subdivision (4) of subsection 6 of this section;
108 (b) The Executive Committee shall give advance notice of its meetings, posted on
109 its website and as determined to provide notice to persons with an interest in the
110 business of the Commission; and

HCS HB 2957 13
111 (c) The Executive Committee may hold a special meeting in accordance with
112 subdivision (2) of subsection 6 of this section.
113 5. The Commission shall adopt and provide to the Member States an annual
114 report.
115 6. (1) All meetings of the Commission that are not closed pursuant to
116 subdivision (4) of this subsection shall be open to the public. Notice of public meetings
117 shall be posted on the Commission's website at least thirty (30) days prior to the public
118 meeting.
119 (2) Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection, the Commission may
120 convene an emergency public meeting by providing at least twenty-four (24) hours prior
121 notice on the Commission's website, and any other means as provided in the
122 Commission's Rules, for any of the reasons it may dispense with notice of proposed
123 rulemaking under subsection 7 of section 334.1974. The Commission's legal counsel
124 shall certify that one of the reasons justifying an emergency public meeting has been
125 met.
126 (3) Notice of all Commission meetings shall provide the time, date, and location
127 of the meeting, and if the meeting is to be held or accessible via telecommunication,
128 video conference, or other electronic means, the notice shall include the mechanism for
129 access to the meeting.
130 (4) The Commission or the Executive Committee may convene in a closed, non-
131 public meeting for the Commission or Executive Committee to receive or solicit legal
132 advice or to discuss:
133 (a) Non-compliance of a Member State with its obligations under the Compact;
134 (b) The employment, compensation, discipline or other matters, practices or
135 procedures related to specific employees;
136 (c) Current or threatened discipline of a Licensee or Compact Privilege holder
137 by the Commission or by a Member State's Respiratory Therapy Licensing Authority;
138 (d) Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation;
139 (e) Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or sale of goods, services, or
140 real estate;
141 (f) Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;
142 (g) Trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged or
143 confidential;
144 (h) Information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a clearly
145 unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
146 (i) Investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes;

HCS HB 2957 14
147 (j) Information related to any investigative reports prepared by or on behalf of
148 or for use of the Commission or other committee charged with responsibility of
149 investigation or determination of compliance issues pursuant to the Compact;
150 (k) Legal advice;
151 (l) Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or Member State
152 law; or
153 (m) Other matters as promulgated by the Commission by Rule.
154 (5) If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the presiding officer shall state
155 that the meeting will be closed and reference each relevant exempting provision, and
156 such reference shall be recorded in the minutes.
157 (6) The Commission shall keep minutes in accordance with Commission Rules
158 and bylaws. All documents considered in connection with an action shall be identified in
159 such minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal,
160 subject to release only by a majority vote of the Commission or order of a court of
161 competent jurisdiction.
162 7. (1) The Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable
163 expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing activities.
164 (2) The Commission may accept any and all appropriate revenue sources as
165 provided herein.
166 (3) The Commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from each
167 Member State and impose fees on Licensees of Member States to whom it grants a
168 Compact Privilege to cover the cost of the operations and activities of the Commission
169 and its staff. The aggregate annual assessment amount for Member States, if any, shall
170 be allocated based upon a formula that the Commission shall promulgate by Rule.
171 (4) The Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to securing the
172 funds or a loan adequate to meet the same; nor shall the Commission pledge the credit
173 of any of the Member States, except by and with the authority of the Member State.
174 (5) The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and
175 disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the Commission shall be subject
176 to the financial review and accounting procedures established under its bylaws.
177 However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the Commission shall be
178 subject to an annual financial review by a certified or licensed public accountant, and
179 the report of the financial review shall be included in and become part of the annual
180 report of the Commission.
181 8. (1) Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the liability of any
182 Licensee for professional malpractice or misconduct, which shall be governed solely by
183 any other applicable state laws.

HCS HB 2957 15
184 (2) The Member States, Commissioners, officers, executive directors, employees,
185 and agents of the Commission shall be immune from suit and liability, both personally
186 and in their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal
187 injury or other civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error,
188 or omission that occurred, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a
189 reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Commission employment,
190 duties or responsibilities; provided that nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to
191 protect any such person from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability
192 caused by the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person. The
193 procurement of insurance of any type by the Commission shall not in any way
194 compromise or limit the immunity granted hereunder.
195 (3) The Commission shall defend any Commissioner, officer, executive director,
196 employee, and agent of the Commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability
197 arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope
198 of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or as determined by the
199 Commission that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for
200 believing occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or
201 responsibilities; provided that nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that
202 person from retaining their own counsel at their own expense; and provided further,
203 that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that person's
204 intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.
205 (4) The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any Commissioner,
206 member, officer, executive director, employee, and agent of the Commission for the
207 amount of any settlement or judgment obtained against that person arising out of any
208 actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of Commission
209 employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that such person had a reasonable basis for
210 believing occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or
211 responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not
212 result from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person.
213 (5) Nothing in this Compact shall be interpreted to waive or otherwise abrogate
214 a Member State's state action immunity or state action affirmative defense with respect
215 to antitrust claims under the Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or any other State or federal
216 antitrust or anticompetitive law or regulation.
217 (6) Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign
218 immunity by the Member States or by the Commission.

HCS HB 2957 16
334.1971. 1. The Commission shall provide for the development, maintenance,
operation, and utilization of a coordinated database and reporting system containing
licensure, Adverse Action, and the presence of Significant Investigative Information.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of State law to the contrary, a Member
State shall submit a uniform data set to the Data System as required by the Rules of the
Commission, including but not limited to:
(1) Identifying information;
(2) Licensure data;
(3) Adverse Actions against a Licensee, license applicant, or Compact Privilege
holder and information related thereto;
(4) Non-confidential information related to Alternative Program participation,
the beginning and ending dates of such participation, and other information related to
such participation not made confidential under Member State law;
(5) Any denial of application for licensure, and the reason or reasons for such
denial;
(6) The presence of current Significant Investigative Information; and
(7) Other information that may facilitate the administration of this Compact or
the protection of the public, as determined by the Rules of the Commission.
3. No Member State shall submit any information which constitutes criminal
history record information, as defined by applicable federal law, to the Data System
established hereunder.
4. The records and information provided to a Member State pursuant to this
Compact or through the Data System, when certified by the Commission or an agent
thereof, shall constitute the authenticated business records of the Commission, and shall
be entitled to any associated hearsay exception in any relevant judicial, quasi-judicial or
administrative proceedings in a Member State.
5. Significant Investigative Information pertaining to a Licensee in any Member
State will only be available to other Member States.
6. It is the responsibility of the Member States to report any Adverse Action
against a Licensee and to monitor the database to determine whether Adverse Action
has been taken against a Licensee. Adverse Action information pertaining to a Licensee
in any Member State will be available to any other Member State.
7. Member States contributing information to the Data System may designate
information that may not be shared with the public without the express permission of
the contributing State.

HCS HB 2957 17
8. Any information submitted to the Data System that is subsequently expunged
pursuant to federal law or the laws of the Member State contributing the information
shall be removed from the Data System.
334.1974. 1. The Commission shall promulgate reasonable Rules in order to
effectively and efficiently implement and administer the purposes and provisions of the
Compact. A Rule shall be invalid and have no force or effect only if a court of
competent jurisdiction holds that the Rule is invalid because the Commission exercised
its rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond the scope and purposes of the
Compact, or the powers granted hereunder, or based upon another applicable standard
of review.
2. For purposes of the Compact, the Rules of the Commission shall have the
force of law in each Member State.
3. The Commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the criteria
set forth in this section and the Rules adopted thereunder. Rules shall become binding
as of the date specified in each Rule.
4. If a majority of the legislatures of the Member States rejects a Rule or portion
of a Rule, by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the
Compact within four (4) years of the date of adoption of the Rule, then such Rule shall
have no further force and effect in any Member State.
5. Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the Commission.
6. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule, the Commission shall hold a public
hearing and allow persons to provide oral and written comments, data, facts, opinions,
and arguments.
7. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule by the Commission, and at least thirty
(30) days in advance of the meeting at which the Commission will hold a public hearing
on the proposed Rule, the Commission shall provide a notice of proposed rulemaking:
(1) On the website of the Commission or other publicly accessible platform;
(2) To persons who have requested notice of the Commission's notices of
proposed rulemaking; and
(3) In such other way or ways as the Commission may by Rule specify.
8. The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:
(1) The time, date, and location of the public hearing at which the Commission
will hear public comments on the proposed Rule and, if different, the time, date, and
location of the meeting where the Commission will consider and vote on the proposed
Rule;

HCS HB 2957 18
(2) If the hearing is held via telecommunication, video conference, or other
electronic means, the Commission shall include the mechanism for access to the hearing
in the notice of proposed rulemaking;
(3) The text of the proposed Rule and the reason therefor;
(4) A request for comments on the proposed Rule from any interested person;
and
(5) The manner in which interested persons may submit written comments.
9. All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording and all written
comments and documents received by the Commission in response to the proposed Rule
shall be available to the public.
10. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on
each Rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the Commission at hearings
required by this section.
11. The Commission shall, by majority vote of all Commissioners, take final
action on the proposed Rule based on the rulemaking record and the full text of the
Rule.
(1) The Commission may adopt changes to the proposed Rule provided the
changes are consistent with the original purpose of the proposed Rule.
(2) The Commission shall provide an explanation of the reasons for substantive
changes made to the proposed Rule as well as reasons for substantive changes not made
that were recommended by commenters.
(3) The Commission shall determine a reasonable effective date for the Rule.
Except for an emergency as provided in subsection 12 of this section, the effective date
of the Rule shall be no sooner than thirty (30) days after issuing the notice that it
adopted or amended the Rule.
12. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the Commission may consider
and adopt an emergency Rule with twenty-four (24) hours' notice, and with opportunity
to comment, provided that the usual rulemaking procedures provided in the Compact
and in this section shall be retroactively applied to the Rule as soon as reasonably
possible, in no event later than ninety (90) days after the effective date of the Rule. For
the purposes of this provision, an emergency Rule is one that must be adopted
immediately in order to:
(1) Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
(2) Prevent a loss of Commission or Member State funds;
(3) Meet a deadline for the promulgation of a Rule that is established by federal
law or Rule; or
(4) Protect public health and safety.

HCS HB 2957 19
13. The Commission or an authorized committee of the Commission may direct
revisions to a previously adopted Rule for purposes of correcting typographical errors,
errors in format, errors in consistency, or grammatical errors. Public notice of any
revisions shall be posted on the website of the Commission. The revision shall be subject
to challenge by any person for a period of thirty (30) days after posting. The revision
may be challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a material change to a
Rule. A challenge shall be made in writing and delivered to the Commission prior to the
end of the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision will take effect without
further action. If the revision is challenged, the revision may not take effect without the
approval of the Commission.
14. (1) No Member State's rulemaking process or procedural requirements shall
apply to the Commission.
(2) The Commission shall have no authority over any Member State's
rulemaking process or procedural requirements that do not pertain to the Compact.
15. Nothing in this Compact, nor any Rule or regulation of the Commission,
shall be construed to limit, restrict, or in any way reduce the ability of a Member State
to enact and enforce laws, regulations, or other Rules related to the Practice of
Respiratory Therapy in that State, where those laws, regulations, or other Rules are not
inconsistent with the provisions of this Compact.
334.1977. 1. (1) The executive and judicial branches of State government in
each Member State shall enforce this Compact and take all actions necessary and
appropriate to implement the Compact.
(2) Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the Commission shall
be brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where the
principal office of the Commission is located. The Commission may waive venue and
jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative
dispute resolution proceedings. Nothing herein shall affect or limit the selection or
propriety of venue in any action against a Licensee for professional malpractice,
misconduct or any such similar matter.
(3) The Commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in any
proceeding regarding the enforcement or interpretation of the Compact and shall have
standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide the
Commission service of process shall render a judgment or order void as to the
Commission, this Compact, or promulgated Rules.
2. (1) If the Commission determines that a Member State has defaulted in the
performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this Compact or the
promulgated Rules, the Commission shall provide written notice to the defaulting

HCS HB 2957 20
State. The notice of default shall describe the default, the proposed means of curing the
default, and any other action that the Commission may take, and shall offer training
and specific technical assistance regarding the default.
(2) The Commission shall provide a copy of the notice of default to the other
Member States.
3. If a State in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting State may be
terminated from the Compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the
Commissioners of the Member States, and all rights, privileges and benefits conferred
on that State by this Compact may be terminated on the effective date of termination. A
cure of the default does not relieve the offending State of obligations or liabilities
incurred during the period of default.
4. Termination of membership in the Compact shall be imposed only after all
other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or
terminate shall be given by the Commission to the governor, the majority and minority
leaders of the defaulting State's legislature, the defaulting State's Respiratory Therapy
Licensing Authority and each of the Member States' Respiratory Therapy Licensing
Authorities.
5. A State that has been terminated is responsible for all assessments,
obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination, including
obligations that extend beyond the effective date of termination, if necessary.
6. Upon the termination of a State's membership from this Compact, that State
shall immediately provide notice to all Licensees and Compact Privilege holders (of
which the Commission has a record) within that State of such termination. The
terminated State shall continue to recognize all licenses granted pursuant to this
Compact for a minimum of one hundred eighty (180) days after the date of said notice of
termination.
7. The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a State that is found to be
in default or that has been terminated from the Compact, unless agreed upon in writing
between the Commission and the defaulting State.
8. The defaulting State may appeal the action of the Commission by petitioning
the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the
Commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of
such litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees.
9. (1) Upon request by a Member State, the Commission shall attempt to resolve
disputes related to the Compact that arise among Member States and between Member
and non-Member States.

HCS HB 2957 21
(2) The Commission shall promulgate a Rule providing for both mediation and
binding dispute resolution for disputes, as appropriate.
10. (1) By majority vote, as may be further provided by Rule, the Commission
may initiate legal action against a Member State in default in the United States District
Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has its
principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of the Compact and its
promulgated Rules. A Member State by enactment of this Compact consents to venue
and jurisdiction in such court for the purposes set forth herein. The relief sought may
include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is
necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including
reasonable attorney's fees. The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of
the Commission. The Commission may pursue any other remedies available under
federal or the defaulting Member State's law.
(2) A Member State may initiate legal action against the Commission in the U.S.
District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the Commission
has its principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of the Compact and its
promulgated Rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages.
In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all
costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees.
(3) No person other than a Member State shall enforce this Compact against the
Commission.
334.1980. 1. The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which the
Compact statute is enacted into law in the seventh Member State ("Effective Date").
(1) On or after the Effective Date of the Compact, the Commission shall convene
and review the enactment of each of the first seven Member States ("Charter Member
States") to determine if the statute enacted by each such Charter Member State is
materially different than the Model Compact.
(a) A Charter Member State whose enactment is found to be materially different
from the Model Compact shall be entitled to the default process set forth in section
334.1977.
(b) If any Member State is later found to be in default, or is terminated or
withdraws from the Compact, the Commission shall remain in existence and the
Compact shall remain in effect even if the number of Member States should be less than
seven.
(2) Member States enacting the Compact subsequent to the seven initial Charter
Member States shall be subject to the process set forth herein and Commission Rule to

HCS HB 2957 22
determine if their enactments are materially different from the Model Compact and
whether they qualify for participation in the Compact.
(3) All actions taken for the benefit of the Commission or in furtherance of the
purposes of the administration of the Compact prior to the effective date of the Compact
or the Commission coming into existence shall be considered to be actions of the
Commission unless specifically repudiated by the Commission. The Commission shall
own and have all rights to any intellectual property developed on behalf or in
furtherance of the Commission by individuals or entities involved in organizing or
establishing the Commission, as may be further set forth in Rules of the Commission.
(4) Any State that joins the Compact subsequent to the Commission's initial
adoption of the Rules and bylaws shall be subject to the Rules and bylaws as they exist
on the date on which the Compact becomes law in that State. Any Rule that has been
previously adopted by the Commission shall have the full force and effect of law on the
date the Compact becomes law in that State.
2. Any Member State may withdraw from this Compact by enacting a statute
repealing the same.
(1) A Member State's withdrawal shall not take effect until one hundred eighty
(180) days after enactment of the repealing statute.
(2) Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing
State's Respiratory Therapy Licensing Authority to comply with the investigative and
Adverse Action reporting requirements of this Compact prior to the effective date of
withdrawal.
(3) Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this Compact, a State
shall immediately provide notice of such withdrawal to all Licensees and Compact
Privilege holders (of which the Commission has a record) within that State.
Notwithstanding any subsequent statutory enactment to the contrary, such
withdrawing State shall continue to recognize all licenses granted pursuant to this
Compact for a minimum of one hundred eighty (180) days after the date of such notice
of withdrawal.
3. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent
any licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a Member State
and a non-Member State that does not conflict with the provisions of this Compact.
4. This Compact may be amended by the Member States. No amendment to this
Compact shall become effective and binding upon any Member State until it is enacted
into the laws of all Member States.
334.1983. 1. This Compact and the Commission's rulemaking authority shall be
liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes and the implementation and

HCS HB 2957 23
administration of the Compact. Provisions of the Compact expressly authorizing or
requiring the promulgation of Rules shall not be construed to limit the Commission's
rulemaking authority solely for those purposes.
2. The provisions of this Compact shall be severable, and if any phrase, clause,
sentence or provision of this Compact is held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be
contrary to the constitution of any Member State, a State seeking participation in the
Compact, or of the United States, or the applicability thereof to any government,
agency, person or circumstance is held to be unconstitutional by a court of competent
jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder of this Compact and the applicability thereof
to any other government, agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby.
3. Notwithstanding subsection 2 of this section, the Commission may deny a
State's participation in the Compact or, in accordance with the requirements of section
334.1977, terminate a Member State's participation in the Compact, if it determines that
a constitutional requirement of a Member State is a material departure from the
Compact. Otherwise, if this Compact shall be held to be contrary to the constitution of
any Member State, the Compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining
Member States and in full force and effect as to the Member State affected as to all
severable matters.
334.1986. 1. Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any
other law of a Member State that is not inconsistent with the Compact.
2. Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements in a Member State
in conflict with the Compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict, including any
subsequently enacted State laws.
3. All permissible agreements between the Commission and the Member States
are binding in accordance with their terms.
4. Other than as expressly set forth herein, nothing in this Compact will impact
initial licensure.
✔